District of Columbia statutes.
3-1202.05

Board of Long-Term Care Administration.

(a)

There is established a Board of Long-Term Care Administration to consist of 7 members appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council.

(b)

The Board shall regulate the practice of nursing home administration, the practice of assisted living administration, and the practice of home health care administration.

(c)

Of the members of the Board, 2 shall be nursing home administrators licensed in the District, one shall be an assisted living administrator licensed in the District, one shall be an educator from an institution of higher learning engaged in teaching health care administration, one shall be an allied health professional licensed in the District who has a demonstrated interest in long-term care, one shall be a health professional licensed in the District who has experience in long-term care such as a social worker or other long-term care professional such as a home health care administrator, and one shall be a consumer member.

(d)

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, members of the Board shall be appointed for terms of 3 years.

(e)

Of the members initially appointed under this section, 2 shall be appointed for a term of one year, 2 shall be appointed for a term of 2 years, and 3 shall be appointed for a term of 3 years. The terms of the members first appointed shall begin on the date that a majority of the first members are sworn in, which shall become the anniversary date for all subsequent appointments.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 205, 33 DCR 729
Oct. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 7-31, § 3(d), 34 DCR 3789
Mar. 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 102(f), 61 DCR 1184
This section is referenced in § 1-523.01.
1981 Ed., § 2-3302.5.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-96 rewrote the section.